Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1685.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 4, to read: ARTICLE 4. ARIZONA COMMISSION ON LATINO AFFAIRS START_STATUTE41-541. Arizona commission on Latino affairs A. The Arizona commission on Latino affairs is established and consists of: 1. the following advisory members appointed by the governor: (a) A statewide Latino leader with demonstrated experience and advocacy in support of public education. (b) A Latino health expert with professional experience in public health, health equity or health care delivery serving Latino communities in this state. (c) A licensed attorney admitted to practice in this state who has demonstrated experience advocating for the civil rights of Latinos in Arizona. (d) A licensed social worker or social services professional with demonstrated expertise in programs primarily serving Latino communities. (e) A Latino small business owner REPRESENTING southern arizona with at least ten years of business ownership experience. (f) A LATINO SMALL BUSINESS OWNER REPRESENTING northern ARIZONA WITH AT LEAST TEN YEARS OF BUSINESS OWNERSHIP EXPERIENCE. (g) A LATINO SMALL BUSINESS OWNER REPRESENTING central ARIZONA WITH AT LEAST TEN YEARS OF BUSINESS OWNERSHIP EXPERIENCE. (h) The Executive Director of the Arizona-Mexico Commission, or the Executive Director's designee. 2. nine voting members who are appointed by the governor, seven of whom are Latino and two of whom are not Latino. B. The term of office of each member appointed pursuant to subsection a, paragraph 2 of this section is three years. Each member shall hold office until the member's successor is appointed and qualifies. Appointment to fill a vacancy caused other than by expiration of a term shall be for the unexpired portion of the term. C. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation. D. The commission shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from among its members appointed pursuant to subsection a, paragraph 2 of this section and adopt rules for the conduct of meetings.  A record shall be kept of all proceedings and transactions. E. Section 41-2955, subsection d does not apply to the commission. F. The commission shall meet at least quarterly on the second Thursday of the first month of each quarter and may hold additional meetings on the call of the chairperson. A majority of the members of the commission appointed pursuant to subsection a, paragraph 2 of this section constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.  advisory members may not vote.  Members who fail to attend three consecutive meetings are deemed to have resigned. G. The members of the commission appointed pursuant to subsection a, paragraph 2 of this section shall employ, subject to chapter 4, article 4 of this title, an executive director of the commission who may not be a member of the commission. The executive director is eligible to receive compensation as determined by the commission from monies available in the Arizona commission on Latino affairs fund established by section 41-543.  The commission may employ clerical, professional and technical personnel subject to chapter 4, article 4 of this title and monies available in the Arizona commission on Latino affairs fund and shall prescribe their duties and determine their compensation. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-542. Power and duties; information; annual report A. The commission shall: 1. Assist and support state and federal agencies in assisting Latinos in this state to develop mutual goals, to design projects for achieving goals and to implement their projects. 2. Advise the governor on policies, procedures, legislation and rules that affect the Latino community and that will enable this state to be responsive to the needs of the Latino community. 3. Assist local Latino community groups in developing strategies and programs that will expand and enhance the social, cultural and economic status of the Latino community. 4. Develop, review and recommend to the governor policies in the areas of health and human services, housing, education, employment, business formation and development, public accommodations and contracting and procedures. 5. Serve as a liaison to federal, state and local agencies to ensure that programs affecting Latinos are effectively used and that benefits accrue equitably to members of the Latino community. 6. Work for greater understanding and improved relationships between Latinos and non-Latinos by creating an awareness of the legal, social and economic needs of Latinos in this state. 7. Where appropriate, conduct periodic conferences throughout this state to inform Latinos of the opportunities available to them through state and private sources, to encourage them to share their history and culture with other Arizonans, to participate in the social and political processes of their communities and to learn from conference participants about their needs and problems. B. State and local public officers and employees, on request, shall furnish the commission with information that it may require for its purposes except information that is not subject to disclosure pursuant to a provision of law. C. On or before December 31 of each year, the commission shall submit a report giving an account of its proceedings, transactions, findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislature and may submit the recommendations to the legislature in the form of proposed legislation.  The commission shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. D. The commission may apply for, accept, receive and spend public and private gifts or grants of money or property on those terms and conditions as imposed by the donor and to implement the commission's internal operations. E. The commission may accept, receive and spend fees collected at the Arizona Latino town hall to defer expenses for the Arizona Latino town hall. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-543. Arizona commission on Latino affairs fund; exemption The Arizona commission on Latino affairs fund is established consisting of monies received pursuant to section 41-542. The Arizona commission on Latino affairs shall administer the fund.  The monies in the Arizona commission on Latino affairs fund are continuously appropriated and are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations.  The state treasurer shall invest and divest all monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE41-544. Latino legislative day The Arizona commission on Latino affairs shall annually facilitate a Latino legislative day on the second Thursday of march. The commission shall invite the legislature, the governor and other elected officials to pay tribute to the history and culture of Latinos and their contributions to the prosperity and cultural diversity of the United States. The commission shall schedule activities and discussions between state and community leaders on issues affecting Latino communities. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Initial terms of members of the Arizona commission on Latino affairs A. Notwithstanding section 41-541, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, the initial terms of members of the Arizona commission on Latino affairs who are appointed pursuant to section 41-541, subsection A, paragraph 2, as added by this act, are: 1. Three terms ending January 1, 2028. 2. Three terms ending January 1, 2029. 3. Three terms ending January 1, 2030. B. The governor shall make all subsequent appointments as prescribed by statute.